el: Συμβατή επιφάνεια παιχνιδιού: Τεχνητό γρασίδι; Σταθερό έδαφος; Σκληρό έδαφος; Εσωτερικού χώρου; Πολλαπλών επιφανειών; Φυσικό γρασίδι; Μαλακό έδαφος; Τεχνητός χλοοτάπητας; Άλλο
sk-SK: Kompatibilná herná plocha: Umelá tráva; Pevný povrch; Tvrdý povrch; Do interiéru; Na rôzne povrchy; Prírodná tráva; Mäkký povrch; Turf; Iné
pt-PT: Superfície de jogo compatível: Relva artificial; Piso firme; Piso duro; Interior; Multissuperfície; Relva natural; Piso mole; Sintético; Outro
pt-BR: Superfície de jogo compatível: Grama artificial; Campo firme; Campo duro; Indoor/Quadra; Multissuperfície; Grama natural; Campo macio; Society (Turf); Outra
hr-HR: Kompatibilna površina za igranje: Umjetna trava; Tvrda podloga; Tvrdi teren; U dvorani; Više površina; Prirodna trava; Meka podloga; Travnjak (turf); Ostalo
en: Compatible playing surface: Artificial grass; Firm ground; Hard ground; Indoor; Multi-surface; Natural grass; Soft ground; Turf; Other
sl-SI: Združljiva igralna površina: Umetna trava; Čvrsta podlaga; Trda podlaga; V dvorani; Za več podlag; Naravna trava; Mehka podlaga; Umetna trava (turf); Drugo
vi: Bề mặt chơi tương thích: Cỏ nhân tạo; Sân cỏ tự nhiên; Sân đất cứng; Sân trong nhà; Đa mặt sân; Cỏ tự nhiên; Sân cỏ mềm; Sân cỏ nhân tạo (Turf); Khác
es: Superficie de juego compatible: Césped artificial; Terreno firme; Terreno duro; Interior; Multisuperficie; Césped natural; Terreno blando; Césped sintético; Otro
tr: Uyumlu oyun yüzeyi: Suni çim; Sert zemin; Sert zemin; Kapalı alan; Çoklu yüzey; Doğal çim; Yumuşak zemin; Halı saha; Diğer
de: Kompatible Spielfläche: Kunstrasen; Fester Boden; Harter Boden; Halle; Multioberfläche; Naturrasen; Weicher Boden; Kunstrasen/Hartplatz; Sonstige
ja: 対応プレイ表面: 人工芝; ファームグラウンド; ハードグラウンド; インドア; マルチサーフェス; 天然芝; ソフトグラウンド; ターフ; その他
ko: 호환 경기장 표면: 인조 잔디; 펌 그라운드; 하드 그라운드; 인도어; 멀티 서페이스; 천연 잔디; 소프트 그라운드; 터프; 기타
da: Kompatibel spilleoverflade: Kunstgræs; Fast underlag; Hårdt underlag; Indendørs; Flere underlag; Naturgræs; Blødt underlag; Grus/kunstgræs; Andet
nl: Compatibel speelveld: Kunstgras; Vaste ondergrond; Harde ondergrond; Zaal; Meerdere ondergronden; Natuurgras; Zachte ondergrond; Turf; Overig
nb: Kompatibel lekeoverflate: Kunstgress; Fast underlag; Hardt underlag; Innendørs; Flere underlag; Naturgress; Mykt underlag; Turf; Annet
ro-RO: Suprafață de joc compatibilă: Gazon artificial; Teren ferm; Teren dur; Interior; Multi-suprafață; Gazon natural; Teren moale; Gazon sintetic; Altele
it: Superficie di gioco compatibile: Erba sintetica; Terreni compatti (FG); Terreni duri (HG); Indoor (IN); Multisuperficie; Erba naturale; Terreni morbidi (SG); Sintetico outdoor (TF); Altro
hu: Kompatibilis játszófelület: Műfű; Kemény talaj; Szilárd talaj; Beltéri; Több felületű; Természetes fű; Puha talaj; Gyep; Egyéb
zh-CN: 适用场地: 人造草坪; 偏硬草地 (FG); 硬地 (HG); 室内 (IN); 多场地适用; 天然草坪; 松软草地 (SG); 人工草地; 其他
cs: Vhodný povrch pro hru: Umělá tráva; Pevný povrch; Tvrdý povrch; Vnitřní povrch; Více povrchů; Přírodní tráva; Měkký povrch; Umělý trávník (Turf); Jiné
fi: Yhteensopiva leikkipinta: Tekonurmi; Kiinteä alusta; Kova alusta; Sisäpelialusta; Monialusta; Luonnonnurmi; Pehmeä alusta; Hiekka-/tekonurmi; Muu
pl: Zgodna powierzchnia do zabawy: Sztuczna trawa; Twarda nawierzchnia (FG) / Twarda murawa; Twarda nawierzchnia; Hala / Indoor; Wiele nawierzchni; Naturalna trawa; Miękka nawierzchnia; Sztuczna murawa; Inne
bg-BG: Съвместимост на игралното поле: Изкуствена трева; Твърда почва; Твърда настилка; На закрито; Различни настилки; Естествена трева; Мека почва; Тревна настилка; Друго
ru: Совместимая игровая поверхность: Искусственная трава; Твердый грунт; Очень твердый грунт / жесткое покрытие; В помещении; Мультипокрытие; Натуральный газон; Мягкий грунт; Искусственный газон; Другое
fr: Surface de jeu compatible: Pelouse artificielle; Terrain sec; Terrain dur; En salle; Multisurface; Pelouse naturelle; Terrain gras; Synthétique; Autre
sv: Kompatibel lekyta: Konstgräs; Fast underlag (FG); Hårt underlag (HG); Inomhus; Flera underlag; Naturgräs; Mjukt underlag (SG); Konstgräs (turf); Övrigt
lt-LT: Suderinamas žaidimo paviršius: Dirbtinė žolė; Kietas gruntas; Kietas paviršius; Vidaus patalpų; Keli paviršiai; Natūrali žolė; Minkštas gruntas; Velėna; Kita
zh-TW: 相容遊玩表面: 人造草皮; 偏硬天然草皮 (FG); 硬地球場 (HG); 室內; 多種場地; 天然草皮; 鬆軟天然草皮 (SG); 人工草皮 (TF); 其他
th: พื้นผิวสนามที่เหมาะสม: หญ้าเทียม; พื้นแข็ง; พื้นดินแข็ง; ในร่ม; หลายพื้นผิว; หญ้าจริง; พื้นอ่อน; สนามหญ้าเทียม; อื่นๆ